hu: Tűpárna jellemzői: Állítható csuklópánt; Beépített tűbefűző; Csipesz a rögzítéshez; Kézzel készült; Csiszolóporos élezővel; Tűket tartalmaz; Gombostűket tartalmaz; Mágneses tűtartó; Csúszásmentes talp; Tárolórekesz; Mosható huzat; Egyéb
ja: ピンストップクッション機能: 調整可能なリストストラップ; 糸通し内蔵; アタッチメント用クランプ/クリップ; ハンドメイド; エメリー研磨剤入り; 針付き; ピン付き; マグネット式ピンホルダー; 滑り止めベース; 収納コンパートメント; 洗濯可能なカバー; その他
sl-SI: Lastnosti blazinice za bucike: Nastavljiv zapestni trak; Vgrajen vdevalnik niti; Sponka za pritrditev; Ročno izdelano; Vključuje brusilnik s smirkovim prahom; Vključuje šivanke; Vključuje bucike; Magnetno držalo za bucike; Nedrseč podstavek; Prostor za shranjevanje; Pralna prevleka; Drugo
zh-TW: 針插特色: 可調式腕帶; 內建穿線器; 附固定夾; 手工製作; 含金剛砂磨針器; 含縫線針; 含大頭針; 磁吸大頭針座; 防滑底座; 收納隔層; 可機洗布套; 其他
pt-PT: marcado com um recurso de almofada de alfinetes: Correia de pulso ajustável; Enfiador de agulhas integrado; Grampo/clipe de fixação; Artesanal; Inclui afiador de esmeril; Inclui agulhas; Inclui alfinetes; Suporte magnético para alfinetes; Base antiderrapante; Compartimento de arrumação; Capa lavável; Outra
zh-CN: 徽章软垫功能: 可调节腕带; 内置穿线器; 固定夹子/夹扣; 手工; 包含金刚砂磨针器; 包含针; 包含大头针; 磁力大头针座; 防滑底座; 储物隔层; 可水洗套; 其他
nl: Speldenkussen kenmerken: Verstelbare polsband; Ingebouwde draaddoorsteker; Klem/clip voor bevestiging; Handgemaakt; Inclusief amarilslijper; Inclusief naalden; Inclusief spelden; Magnetische speldenhouder; Antislipbodem; Opbergvak; Wasbare hoes; Overige
pl: Cechy poduszeczki na szpilki: Regulowany pasek na nadgarstek; Wbudowany nawlekacz do igieł; Zacisk/klips do mocowania; Wykonanie ręczne; Zawiera ostrzałkę szmerglową; Zawiera igły; Zawiera szpilki; Magnetyczny uchowy na szpilki; Antypoślizgowa podstawa; Schowek; Pokrowiec nadający się do prania; Inne
nb: Funksjoner for nålepute: Justerbar håndleddsstropp; Innebygd nåletreder; Klemme/klips for feste; Håndlaget; Inkluderer nålesliper; Inkluderer nåler; Inkluderer knappenåler; Magnetisk nåleholder; Sklisikker base; Oppbevaringsrom; Vaskbart trekk; Annet
bg-BG: Характеристики на възглавничката за карфици.: Регулируема каишка за китка; Вградена вдевачка; Скоба/клипс за прикрепване; Ръчна изработка; Включва шмиргел за острене; Включва игли; Включва карфици; Магнитен държач за карфици; Нехлъзгаща се основа; Отделение за съхранение; Калъф, подходящ за пране; Друго
ru: Функциональные особенности подушечки для игл: Регулируемый ремешок на запястье; Встроенный нитковдеватель; Зажим/клипса для крепления; Ручная работа; Включает наждачную точилку; Включает иглы; Включает булавки; Магнитный держатель для булавок; Нескользящее основание; Отделение для хранения; Моющийся чехол; Другое
lt-LT: Adatų pagalvėlės savybės: Reguliuojamas riešo dirželis; Įmontuotas siūlo įvėrėjas; Gnybtas / spaustukas tvirtinimui; Rankų darbo; Pridedamas švitrinis galąstuvas; Pridedamos adatos; Pridedami smeigtukai; Magnetinis smeigtukų laikiklis; Neslystantis pagrindas; Laikymo skyrius; Plaunamas užvalkalas; Kita
de: Merkmale des Nadelkissens: Verstellbares Handgelenkband; Integrierter Nadeleinfädler; Klemme/Clip zur Befestigung; handgefertigt; Inklusive Nadel-Schärfkissen; Inklusive Nadeln; Inklusive Stecknadeln; Magnetischer Nadelhalter; Rutschfeste Basis; Aufbewahrungsfach; Waschbarer Bezug; Andere
tr: İğne yastığı özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir bilek kayışı; Dahili iğneye iplik geçirme aparatı; Takmak için kelepçe/klips; El yapımı; Zımpara taşı içerir; İğneler dahildir; Toplu iğneler dahildir; Manyetik iğne tutucu; Kaymaz taban; Saklama bölmesi; Yıkanabilir kılıf; Diğer
ko: 핀쿠션 특징: 조절 가능한 손목 스트랩; 내장형 실 꿰기; 부착용 클램프/클립; 핸드 메이드; 에머리 샤프너 포함; 바늘 포함; 핀 포함; 마그네틱 핀 홀더; 미끄럼 방지 베이스; 보관함; 세탁 가능 커버; 기타
it: Caratteristiche del cuscinetto per spille: Cinturino da polso regolabile; Infila aghi integrato; Morsetto/clip per il fissaggio; Fatto a mano; Include temperino in smeriglio; Include aghi; Include spilli; Porta spilli magnetico; Base antiscivolo; Scomparto portaoggetti; Copertura lavabile; Altro
sv: Egenskaper för nålkudde: Justerbar handledsrem; Inbyggd nålpåträdare; Klämma/clips för montering; Handgjord; Inkluderar smärgelslipare; Inkluderar nålar; Inkluderar knappnålar; Magnetisk nålhållare; Glidfri bas; Förvaringsfack; Tvättbart överdrag; Övrigt
pt-BR: Pin cushion recursos: Alça de pulso ajustável; Passador de linha integrado; Grampo/clipe para fixação; Artesanal; Inclui afiador de esmeril; Inclui agulhas; Inclui alfinetes; Porta-alfinetes magnético; Base antiderrapante; Compartimento de armazenamento; Capa lavável; Outros
fr: Fonctions du pique-épingles: Bracelet réglable; Enfile-aiguille intégré; Pince/clip de fixation; Fait main; Avec aiguisoir à l’émeri; Aiguilles incluses; Épingles incluses; Porte-épingles magnétique; Base antidérapante; Compartiment de rangement; Housse lavable; Autre
el: Χαρακτηριστικά του μαξιλαριού για καρφίτσες: Ρυθμιζόμενο λουράκι καρπού; Ενσωματωμένος περαστήρας κλωστής; Σφιγκτήρας/κλιπ για προσάρτηση; Χειροποίητο; Περιλαμβάνει ακονιστήρι με σμύριδα; Περιλαμβάνει βελόνες; Περιλαμβάνει καρφίτσες; Μαγνητική βάση καρφιτσών; Αντιολισθητική βάση; Θήκη αποθήκευσης; Πλενόμενο κάλυμμα; Άλλο
es: Características del alfiletero: Correa de muñeca ajustable; Enhebrador de agujas integrado; Abrazadera/clip para fijación; Hecho a mano; Incluye afilador de esmeril; Incluye agujas; Incluye alfileres; Soporte magnético para alfileres; Base antideslizante; Compartimento de almacenamiento; Cubierta lavable; Otra
hr-HR: Značajke jastučića za igle: Prilagodljivi remen za ručni zglob; Ugrađeni uvođač konca u iglu; Stezaljka/kvačica za pričvršćivanje; Ručno izrađeno; Uključuje jastučić za oštrenje igala; Uključuje igle; Uključuje pribadače; Magnetni držač pribadača; Protuklizna baza; Odjeljak za pohranu; Periva navlaka; Ostalo
cs: Vlastnosti jehelníčku: Nastavitelný pásek na zápěstí; Vestavěný navlékač jehel; Svorka/klip k uchycení; Ruční výroba; Obsahuje smirek na ostření; Obsahuje jehly; Obsahuje špendlíky; Magnetický držák špendlíků; Protiskluzová základna; Úložný prostor; Pratelný potah; Ostatní
en: Pin cushion features: Adjustable wrist strap; Built-in needle threader; Clamp/clip for attachment; Handmade; Includes emery sharpener; Includes needles; Includes pins; Magnetic pin holder; Non-slip base; Storage compartment; Washable cover; Other
sk-SK: Vlastnosti vankúšika na pripínací produkt: Nastaviteľný remienok na zápästie; Zabudovaný navliekač ihiel; Svorka/spona na pripevnenie; Ručne vyrobené; Obsahuje brúsku na ihly; Obsahuje ihly; Obsahuje špendlíky; Magnetický držiak na špendlíky; Protišmyková základňa; Úložný priestor; Prateľný poťah; Iné
da: Nålepudes egenskaber: Justerbar håndledsrem; Indbygget nåletræder; Klemme/clips til fastgørelse; Håndlavet; Inkluderer sliber med smergel; Inkluderer synåle; Inkluderer knappenåle; Magnetisk nåleholder; Skridsikker bund; Opbevaringsrum; Vaskbart betræk; Andet
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale perniței pentru ace: Curea ajustabilă pentru încheietură; Dispozitiv de înfilat ace încorporat; Clemă/Clips pentru atașare; Realizat manual; Include ascuțitor cu șmirghel; Include ace; Include ace cu gămălie; Suport magnetic pentru ace; Bază antiderapantă; Compartiment de depozitare; Husă lavabilă; Altele
fi: Neulatyynyn ominaisuudet: Säädettävä rannehihna; Sisäänrakennettu langanpujotin; Puristin/klipsi kiinnitystä varten; Käsintehty; Sisältää teroitustyynyn; Sisältää neuloja; Sisältää nuppineuloja; Magneettinen neulapidike; Liukumaton pohja; Säilytyslokero; Pestävä päällinen; Muu
th: คุณสมบัติของเบาะรองนั่งพินแล้ว: สายรัดข้อมือปรับได้; ที่ร้อยด้ายในตัว; ที่หนีบ/คลิปสำหรับติด; แฮนด์เมด; รวมที่ลับเข็มผงกากเพชร; รวมเข็ม; รวมเข็มหมุด; ที่เก็บเข็มหมุดแม่เหล็ก; ฐานกันลื่น; ช่องเก็บของ; ปลอกหุ้มซักได้; อื่นๆ
vi: Đặc điểm của gối kim: Dây đeo cổ tay có thể điều chỉnh; Dụng cụ xỏ kim tích hợp; Kẹp/chốt gài để gắn kết; Hàng thủ công; Gồm hạt mài kim; Gồm kim; Gồm ghim; Khay giữ ghim nam châm; Đế chống trượt; Ngăn chứa đồ; Vỏ có thể giặt; Khác